Utah statutes.
4-31-2.   Epidemic of contagious or infectious disease -- Condemnation or
destruction of infected or exposed livestock -- Destruction of other property.
If there is an outbreak of contagious or infectious disease of epidemic
proportion among domestic animals in this state which imperils livestock, the
commissioner, with approval of the governor, may condemn, destroy, or dispose
of any infected livestock or any livestock exposed to, or deemed by the
commissioner capable of, communicating disease to other domestic animals. The
commissioner may also, with gubernatorial approval, condemn and destroy any
barns, sheds, corrals, pens, or other property deemed necessary to prevent the
spread of contagion or infection.
